Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-509.01
Service on
corporation.

A corporation may be served by personal,
residence, certified
mail, or designated delivery service
upon any officer, director, managing agent, or registered agent, or by leaving
the process at the corporation's registered office with a person employed
therein, or by certified mail or
designated delivery service to the corporation's registered office.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 26;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 11.